Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0205.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 10401. (1) A physicianâs private practice office or an urgent care center may do both of the following: (a) Inquire of each new patient who is at least 18 years old and less than 45 years old, either verbally or on a written or electronic form, whether the patient is interested in information on donating bone marrow and, upon the patientâs request, provide the patient with information on becoming a bone marrow donor. If information is provided under this subdivision, it must include contact information for bone marrow donation programs in this state. (b) Inquire of each new patient, either verbally or on a written or electronic form, whether the patient is interested in information on the organ and tissue donor registry and, upon the patientâs request, provide the patient with educational materials explaining the right to make an anatomical gift under part 101, information describing the organ and tissue donor registry, and information on how to have the patientâs name placed in the organ and tissue donor registry. If information is provided under this subdivision, it must include contact information for this stateâs federally designated organ procurement organization or its successor organization as described in section 10120. (2) The materials and information described in this section may be provided to the patient orally or in written or electronic form. (3) As used in this section: (a) âAnatomical giftâ means that term as defined in section 10102. (b) âOrgan and tissue donor registryâ means the donor registry as that term is defined in section 10102. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor